FST/slp/morph_slp_noun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%+N
%+ALN+PSS3S
%+NALN+PSS3S
%nasalchange

LEXICON Root
laŋoʔ noun;
moʔa noun;
oka noun;
kaka noun;
ari noun;
ba noun;
ǝmə̃ noun;
wae noun;
mame noun;
opu noun;
bine noun;
kwae noun;
klake noun;
tarǝ noun;
nuro noun;
hepe noun;
tua noun;
gula noun;
doi noun;
uma noun;
aho noun;
oto noun;
tǝmǝ noun;
puhũ noun;
wai noun;
vave noun;
ikə̃ noun;
kiku noun;
banǝ noun;
wewe noun;
ipǝ noun;
iru noun;
wuli noun;
loto noun;
uti noun;
rata noun;
hǝnǝ noun;
koro noun;
tuho noun;
hiku noun;
klǝkǝ noun;
keli noun;
lei noun;
tae noun;
uǝ noun;
luvu noun;
keko noun;
lima noun;
mǝna noun;
mata noun;
anaʔ noun;

LEXICON noun
%+N:0 alienability;

LEXICON alienability
%+NALN+PSS3S:^nasalchange #;
%+ALN+PSS3S:^=kə̃ #;
